Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Use of Gasoline Tax Revenues

177.320.
Use of portion of gasoline
tax revenues for secondary and rural roads, county roads and bridges
and the Kentucky Transportation Center — Allocation of funds.

Twenty-two and two-tenths percent (22.2%) of all funds arising from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1) and (2), 138.660(1) and (2) and

234.320

shall be set aside for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of secondary and rural roads and for no other purpose, and shall be expended for said purposes by the Transportation Cabinet of the Commonwealth of Kentucky according to the terms and conditions prescribed in KRS

177.330

to

177.360

.

On or after July 1, 1980, eighteen and three-tenths percent (18.3%) of all funds arising from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1) and (2), 138.660(1) and (2), and

234.320

shall be set aside for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of county roads and bridges provided by KRS

179.410

and

179.415

.

All funds set aside in subsection (2) of this section for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of county roads and bridges shall be allocated to the county in accordance with the formula established in KRS 177.360(1) pursuant to KRS

179.410

.

On or after July 1, 1986, one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of all funds arising from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1) and (2),

138.660

and

234.320

shall be set aside for the purposes and functions of the Kentucky Transportation Center as established by KRS

177.375

to

177.380

, except that the receipts provided to the center by this subsection shall not exceed one hundred ninety thousand dollars ($190,000) for any fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 46, § 1; 1972, ch. 61, § 10; 1974, ch. 291, § 1; 1980, ch. 188, § 132, effective July 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 218, § 9, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 265, § 10, effective April 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 350, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 174, § 8, effective July 1, 1986; 1986, ch. 330, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XVII, § 3, effective July 1, 2005.

177.330.
Consultation
by Department of Rural and Municipal Aid with fiscal courts for selection
of roads to be improved — Recommendations — Road through
city with population of less than 3,000.

At least once in each calendar year, the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid, through a duly authorized representative, shall consult with the fiscal courts of the various counties for the purpose of receiving recommendations from the fiscal courts for the selection of rural and secondary roads lying within the counties for construction, reconstruction, or maintenance under the Rural and Secondary Road Program as set forth in KRS 177.320(1). The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid may receive recommendations from any citizen on the selection of rural and secondary roads for construction, reconstruction, or maintenance under the Rural and Secondary Road Program. The Department of Highways shall notify each county fiscal court of the county roads that the department intends to construct, reconstruct, or maintain in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 177 and 179.

Where the construction of a secondary or rural road through an incorporated city with a population of less than three thousand (3,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census is necessary, as determined by the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid, the road may be constructed, reconstructed, or maintained at the discretion of the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 46, § 1; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 1, effective June 26, 1956; 1984, ch. 350, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 238, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 98, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 13, § 10, effective June 25, 2009; 2014, ch. 92, § 249, effective January 1, 2015.

177.340.
Selection
of roads to be improved in case of disagreement with fiscal court
— Roads become part of state highway system.

If, within thirty
(30) days after consulting with a fiscal court, the Department of
Rural and Municipal Aid and the fiscal court fail to agree on the
selection of any rural and secondary roads for construction, reconstruction,
or maintenance under the Rural and Secondary Road Program, the department
may proceed toward the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance
of any road, which, in its discretion, is essential to a system of
secondary highways. Rural and secondary roads constructed, reconstructed,
or maintained in accordance with an agreement between the affected
county and the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid, or selected
for construction, reconstruction, or maintenance by the Department
of Rural and Municipal Aid, at its discretion, without agreement with
the affected county, may become a part of the highway system of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky at the discretion of the Department of Highways.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 46, § 1; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 2; 1984, ch. 350, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 238, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 98, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 13, § 11, effective June 25, 2009.

177.350.
Standards
for construction and improvement of state-maintained secondary and
rural roads — Studies — Surveys — Maps —
Personnel — Equipment.

The Department
of Rural and Municipal Aid may promulgate administrative regulations
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish standards for the construction,
reconstruction, maintenance, and improvement of rural and secondary
roads in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The department shall conduct
studies, make surveys, prepare maps, employ personnel, and obtain
equipment as may be necessary for the establishment and maintenance
of an integrated system of secondary and rural roads in the Commonwealth
of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 46, § 1; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 3; 1984, ch. 350, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 238, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 98, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 13, § 12, effective June 25, 2009.

177.360.
Allocation
of funds for state-maintained roads — Apportionments to be
made on basis of revenue estimates — Uniform financial information
report required.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid shall allocate the funds set apart under KRS 177.320(1) for construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of state-maintained secondary and rural highways as follows:

One-fifth (1/5) shall be apportioned equally among the one hundred twenty (120) counties.

One-fifth (1/5) shall be apportioned among the one hundred twenty (120) counties on the basis of the ratio which the rural population of each county bears to the total rural population of the state. “Rural population” as used here means the population in a county outside cities, towns, and urban areas having a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or more as shown by the most recent decennial census of the United States Bureau of the Census, and county population shall be determined by the most recent decennial census of the United States Bureau of the Census.

One-fifth (1/5) shall be apportioned among the one hundred twenty (120) counties on the basis of the ratio that the public road mileage outside of cities, towns, and urban areas having a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or more bears to the total mileage of such roads for the entire state.

Two-fifths (2/5) shall be apportioned among the one hundred twenty (120) counties on the basis of the ratio which the square-mile rural area of the county bears to the total square-mile rural area of the state. “Rural area” as used here means that area of the county outside of cities, towns, and urban areas having a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or more and shown by the most recent decennial census of the United States Bureau of the Census.

A sum not exceeding six percent (6%) of the allocation provided by KRS 177.320(1) to each county shall be deducted at the beginning of each fiscal year and adjusted quarterly to cover the maintenance, administrative, engineering, and other costs of the program.

Of the total amount apportioned by the provisions of this section, a sum not exceeding six percent (6%) may be deducted and placed by the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid in a special emergency account to be expended at the direction of the commissioner to meet unforeseen emergencies on rural and secondary roads and bridges.

Apportionments as required by the provisions of this section shall be made on the basis of revenue estimates supplied by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and adjusted quarterly in accordance with the most recent revision of the estimates by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Any county eligible to receive county road aid moneys in accordance with KRS

177.320

and this section shall be required to submit a uniform financial information report to the Department for Local Government in accordance with KRS

65.905

before any payment of county road aid funds shall be made. The Department for Local Government shall notify the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid no later than March 1 annually of any county that has not submitted a uniform financial information report. The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid shall, upon notification by the Department for Local Government, immediately suspend all county road aid moneys to the county until the county complies with the provisions of KRS

65.900

to

65.925

and submits the uniform financial information report to the Department for Local Government. The Department for Local Government shall immediately notify the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid to reinstate county road aid moneys to any county affected by this subsection as soon as the county submits the uniform financial information report.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 46, § 1; 1962, ch. 101; 1984, ch. 350, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 273, § 10, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 47, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 69, § 65, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 98, § 10, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 20, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 47, § 82, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 13, § 13, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 117, § 78, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). This section was amended by 2007 Ky. Acts chs. 20 and 47, which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 47, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

177.365.
Reservation of certain tax receipts for urban roads and streets — Definitions.

On and after July 1, 1980, seven and seven-tenths percent (7.7%) of all amounts received from the imposition of the taxes provided for in KRS 138.220(1) and (2), 138.660(1) and (2) and

234.320

shall be set aside by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of urban roads and streets and for no other purpose.

As used in this section unless the context requires otherwise “construction,” “reconstruction,” and “maintenance” mean the supervising, inspecting, actual building, and all expenses incidental to the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of a road or street, including planning, locating, surveying, and mapping or preparing roadway plans, acquisition of rights-of-way, relocation of utilities, lighting and the elimination of other hazards such as roadway grade crossings, and all other items defined in the Department of Highways, design, operations, and construction manuals.

“Urban roads” mean all public ways lying within the limits of the unincorporated urban place as defined in KRS

81.015

, and as described by the Bureau of Census tracts.

“Streets” mean all public ways which have been designated by the incorporated city as being city streets and said streets lying within the boundaries of an incorporated city.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 61, § 11; 1974, ch. 290, § 1; 1980, ch. 218, § 10, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 265, § 11, effective April 1, 1982; 1986, ch. 174, § 9, effective July 1, 1986; 1988, ch. 327, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XVII, § 4, effective July 1, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since § 230 of the Constitution clearly restricts the use of money derived from taxes on gasoline for highway purposes, any legislation directing the money to be used otherwise would be unconstitutional, and broadening a definition of the word “maintenance” to include any activity or project that would decrease cost and expenditures of repair on urban streets and highways would not surmount the constitutional barrier.

OAG 78-144

.

Where funds disbursed by the state from various road use taxes are received by the city pursuant to KRS

177.369

, and the city places these funds in an interest-bearing special road fund account, the interest derived therefrom must be applied to the road-related purposes set forth in this section, Const., § 230 mandates this and since subsection (2) of KRS

177.369

narrowly restricts expenditures for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of urban roads and streets.

OAG 81-143

.

The funds received by the city under the municipal aid program are subject to the general mandate of Const., § 230 concerning road expenditures; KRS 177.369(2) further limits permissible expenditures of such funds to only the “purpose of construction, reconstruction and maintenance of urban roads and streets set forth in this section”; therefore, since a parking lot is not within the definition of “streets,” the city cannot expend its municipal aid funds to pave a public parking lot.

OAG 82-492

.

Municipal road aid funds may be used for the repair, replacement and general maintenance of street lights on public streets.

OAG 84-271

.

Since the sidewalk is generally considered to be part of the street, a city may expend portions of its municipal aid funds to construct, maintain and repair sidewalks and be within the statutory requirement that such funds be spent to construct and maintain its streets.

OAG 84-271

.

The city may not use portions of its municipal aid funds to pay the utility expenses for the operation of its street lighting system; paying the utility bills from the municipal aid funds would go beyond the physical maintenance of the street lighting system.

OAG 84-271

.

177.366.
Allocation of municipal aid funds — Apportionments to be made on basis of revenue estimates — Uniform financial information report.

Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, on and after July 1, 1980, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall allocate to each incorporated city and “unincorporated urban place” its pro rata share of the funds set apart for construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of urban roads and streets on the basis of the ratio which the population in the incorporated cities and in “unincorporated urban places” bears to the total population in incorporated cities and in “unincorporated urban places” of the state. “Unincorporated urban places” as used here, means an area as defined in KRS

81.015

, and any area outside of incorporated cities, which area has a population of 2,500 or more as shown by the most recent decennial census of the United States Bureau of the Census, and all populations shall be determined by the most recent decennial census of the United States.

Any area which becomes incorporated after December 31, 1970, shall not be eligible to participate in the Municipal Aid Program until the beginning of the second fiscal year following its incorporation and population certification. It shall be the responsibility of the newly incorporated area to provide the Finance and Administration Cabinet with documentation from the United States Bureau of the Census showing the population of the newly incorporated area as it existed at the time of the last decennial census.

In the event the newly incorporated area cannot obtain a population count from the Bureau of the Census, it shall not be eligible to participate in the Municipal Aid Program until the next decennial census.

If an incorporated city, whose incorporation took place prior to December 31, 1970, annexes additional area, the population of the annexed area will not be counted in the allocation of municipal aid funds until the beginning of the second fiscal year following annexation and population certification.

It shall be the responsibility of the incorporated city to provide the Finance and Administration Cabinet with documentation from the United States Bureau of the Census showing the population for the annexed area as it existed at the time of the last decennial census.

If the incorporated area cannot obtain a population count from the Bureau of the Census, the annexed area’s population shall not be eligible to be counted in the distribution of the municipal aid fund. However, the streets included in the annexed areas shall be eligible to receive work through this program.

Apportionments as required by the provisions of this section shall be made on the basis of revenue estimates supplied by the Office of State Budget Director and shall be adjusted quarterly in accordance with the most recent revision of the estimates by the Office of State Budget Director.

Any local government eligible to receive municipal road aid moneys pursuant to KRS

177.365

to

177.369

shall be required to submit a uniform financial information report to the Department for Local Government pursuant to KRS

65.905

before any payment of municipal road aid funds shall be made. The Department for Local Government shall notify the Finance and Administration Cabinet no later than March 1 annually of any local government that has not submitted a uniform financial information report. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, upon notification by the Department for Local Government, immediately suspend all municipal road aid moneys to the local government until the local government complies with the provisions of KRS

65.900

to

65.925

and submits the uniform financial information report to the Department for Local Government. The Department for Local Government shall immediately notify the Finance and Administration Cabinet to reinstate municipal road aid moneys to any local government affected by this subsection as soon as the local government submits the uniform financial information report.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 61, § 12; 1974, ch. 178, § 1; 1980, ch. 218, § 11, effective July 1, 1980; 1988, ch. 273, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 327, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 47, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 69, § 66, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 46, § 26, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 20, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 47, § 83, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 79, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). This section was amended by 2007 Ky. Acts chs. 20 and 47, which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 47, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

177.367.
Selection and construction of projects to be funded. [Repealed.]

177.368.
Bureau to furnish annual report to participating cities and unincorporated urban places — Emergency account. [Repealed.]

177.369.
Payment of pro rata share of funds appropriated to incorporated cities and counties.

On and after the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1980 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall pay to each incorporated city and county containing an unincorporated urban place its pro rata share of any funds appropriated and any unexpended balance of funds appropriated for construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of urban roads and streets. During each fiscal year, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall make quarterly payments to each such city and county of the funds set aside and allocated pursuant to KRS

177.365

and

177.366

.

The expenditure of any money received by the city or county pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be made solely for the purpose of construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of urban roads and streets set forth in KRS

177.365

.

Any city or county which has received any money pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall retain all records of the expenditure of such money for a period of five (5) years and said records shall be subject to audit by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for said period of time in order to determine the proper expenditure of said money for the purposes required by KRS

177.365

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 218, § 12, effective July 1, 1980; 1988, ch. 327, § 7, effective July 15, 1988.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a city receives funds disbursed by the state from various road use taxes and received by the city pursuant to this section, and the city places these funds in an interest-bearing special road fund account, the interest derived therefrom must be applied to the road-related purposes set forth in KRS

177.365

since Const., § 230 mandates this and since subsection (2) of this section narrowly restricts expenditures for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of urban roads and streets.

OAG 81-143

.

The funds received by the city under the municipal aid program are subject to the general mandate of Const., § 230 concerning road expenditures; subsection (2) of this section further limits permissible expenditures of such funds to only the “purpose of construction, reconstruction and maintenance of urban roads and streets set forth in KRS

177.365

”; therefore, since a parking lot is not within the definition of “streets,” the city cannot expend its municipal aid funds to pave a public parking lot.

OAG 82-492

.

The city may not use portions of its municipal aid funds to pay the utility expenses for the operation of its street lighting system; paying the utility bills from the municipal aid funds would go beyond the physical maintenance of the street lighting system.

OAG 84-271

.

Since the sidewalk is generally considered to be part of the street, a city may expend portions of its municipal aid funds to construct, maintain and repair sidewalks and be within the statutory requirement that such funds be spent to construct and maintain its streets.

OAG 84-271

.

Municipal road aid funds may be used for the repair, replacement and general maintenance of street lights on public streets.

OAG 84-271

.

177.370.
Recommendations and reports to General Assembly. [Repealed.]